District of Columbia statutes.
47-2881

Placement of Inspector General hotline in permit and license application forms.

(a)

In general. —

Each District of Columbia permit or license application form printed after the expiration of the 30-day period which begins on the date of the enactment of this Act shall include the telephone number established by the Inspector General of the District of Columbia for reporting instances of waste, fraud, and abuse, together with a brief description of the uses and purposes of such number.

(b)

Quarterly reports on use of number. —

Not later than 10 days after the end of such calendar quarter of each fiscal year (beginning with fiscal year 1998), the Inspector General of the District of Columbia shall submit a report to Congress on the number and nature of the calls received through the telephone number described in subsection (a) of this section during the quarter and on the waste, fraud, and abuse detected as a result of such calls.

History

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2185, Pub. L. 105-100, § 155
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(u), 46 DCR 2118
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2881.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.

References in Text

“This Act,” referred to in (a), is the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997, Pub. L. 105-100, 111 Stat. 2160.